Utah statutes.
23-20-9.   Donating protected wildlife.

(1)  A person may only donate protected wildlife or their parts to another person at:

(a)  the residence of the donor;

(b)  the residence of the person receiving protected wildlife or their parts;

(c)  a meat locker;

(d)  a storage plant;

(e)  a meat processing facility; or

(f)  a location authorized by the Wildlife Board in rule, proclamation, or order.

(2)  A written statement of donation shall be kept with the protected wildlife or parts showing:

(a)  the number and species of protected wildlife or parts donated;

(b)  the date of donation;

(c)  the license or permit number of the donor; and

(d)  the signature of the donor.

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), a person may donate the hide of a big game animal to another person or organization at any place without a donation slip.

